District of Columbia statutes.
19-1308.01

Duty to administer trust.

Upon acceptance of a trusteeship, the trustee shall administer the trust in good faith, in accordance with its terms and purposes and the interests of the beneficiaries, and in accordance with this chapter.

History

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 801 of the Uniform Trust Code.